District of Columbia statutes.
8-1426

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, and in consultation with the District of Columbia Department of Transportation, the Emergency Management Agency, the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department, and the Metropolitan Police Department, shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter, including a schedule of permit fees to support analysis, communications to shippers and carriers, and the enforcement program.

History

Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-80, § 7, 53 DCR 1047

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-1424 and § 8-1425.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 7 of Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Temporary Act of 2005 (D.C. Law 16-2, May 14, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 5425).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 7 of Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-43, February 15, 2005, 52 DCR 3048).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 7 of Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-90, June 1, 2005, 52 DCR 5428).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 7 of Second Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-236, December 22, 2005, 53 DCR 245).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 7 of Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-325, March 23, 2006, 53 DCR 2576).